Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.105.030

Eligibility.

(1) An eligible student is a student who:

(a) Is eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012;

(b) Achieved level four on the mathematics or science portion of the high school statewide student assessment or achieved a score in the math section of the SAT or the math section of the ACT that is above the ninety-fifth percentile;

(c) Has a family income at or below one hundred twenty-five percent of the state median family income at the time the student applies for a GET ready for math and science scholarship and for up to the two previous years;

(d) Has declared an intention to complete a qualified program or qualified major or has entered a qualified program or declared a qualified major at an institution of higher education;

(e) Has declared an intention to work in a mathematics, science, or related field in Washington for at least three years immediately following completion of a bachelor's degree or higher degree.

(2) An eligible recipient is an eligible student who:

(a) Has been awarded a scholarship in accordance with the selection criteria and process established by the student achievement council and the program administrator;

(b) Enrolls at an institution of higher education within one year of graduating from high school;

(c) Maintains satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the institution of higher education where the student is enrolled;

(d) Takes at least one college-level mathematics or science course each term since enrolling in an institution of higher education; and

(e) Enters a qualified program or qualified major no later than the end of the first term in which the student has junior level standing.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 11; 2007 c 214 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2013 2nd sp.s. c 22: See note following RCW 28A.655.068.